pl: Zapewnienie czujnika poziomu w zbiorniku przelewowym chłodnicy: Zawiera czujnik poziomu płynu chłodzącego; Brak miejsca na czujnik; Gotowy pod czujnik (tylko port/otwór); Inne
th: การติดตั้งเซ็นเซอร์ระดับน้ำในถังพักน้ำล้นหม้อน้ำ: มีเซนเซอร์ระดับน้ำยาหล่อเย็น; ไม่มีช่องรองรับเซนเซอร์; รองรับเซนเซอร์ (เฉพาะพอร์ต/ช่องรองรับ); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Osiguravanje osjetnik razine preljevnog spremnika hladnjaka: Uključuje senzor razine rashladne tekućine; Bez priključka za senzor; Spremno za senzor (samo priključak); Ostalo
bg-BG: Предвидено място за сензор за ниво на преливния съд на радиатора: Включва сензор за ниво на охлаждащата течност; Без подготовка за сензор; Подготвен за сензор (само порт/отвор); Други
vi: Cung cấp cảm biến mức nước trong bình chứa nước làm mát: Gồm cảm biến mức nước làm mát; Không hỗ trợ cảm biến; Hỗ trợ cảm biến (chỉ cổng/khoang lắp); Khác
es: Incorporación de sensor de nivel del depósito de expansión del radiador: Incluye sensor de nivel de refrigerante; Sin provisión de sensor; Listo para sensor (solo puerto/provisión); Otro
cs: Zajištění snímače hladiny v přepadové nádržce chladiče: Včetně snímače hladiny chladicí kapaliny; Bez přípravy pro snímač; Příprava pro snímač (pouze port/otvor); Ostatní
ja: ラジエーターオーバーフロータンク液面センサー対応: クーラントレベルセンサー付き; センサー機能なし; センサー対応 (ポート/機能のみ); その他
fr: Prédisposition du réservoir de trop-plein pour capteur de niveau: Inclut un capteur de niveau de liquide de refroidissement; Sans emplacement pour capteur; Prêt pour capteur (port/emplacement uniquement); Autre
de: Vorrichtung für Füllstandssensor am Kühlmittel-Ausgleichsbehälter: Inklusive Kühlmittelstandsensor; Kein Sensoranschluss; Sensorvorbereitet (nur Anschluss/Vorrichtung); Sonstige
lt-LT: Radiatoriaus išsiplėtimo bako lygio jutiklio paruošimas: Su aušinimo skysčio lygio jutikliu; Be jutiklio lizdo; Pritaikyta jutikliui (tik prievadas / lizdas); Kita
sl-SI: Priprava za senzor nivoja v ekspanzijski posodi hladilnika: Vključuje senzor nivoja hladilne tekočine; Brez predpriprave za senzor; Pripravljeno za senzor (samo odprtina/predpriprava); Drugo
zh-TW: 散熱器溢流槽液位感測器預留: 包含冷卻液液位感測器; 無感測器配置; 支援感測器 (僅含連接埠/預留孔); 其他
da: Mulighed for niveauføler for radiatoroverløbstank: Inkluderer kølervæskestandsensor; Ingen sensortilslutning; Klargjort til sensor (kun port/tilslutning); Andet
sv: Stöd för nivåsensor i kylaroverflowtank: Inklusive kylvätskenivågivare; Utan givaranslutning; Förberedd för givare (endast anslutning); Övrigt
nl: Radiateur overlooptank niveausensorvoorziening: Inclusief koelvloeistofniveausensor; Geen sensorvoorziening; Sensor-ready (alleen poort/voorziening); Overig
pt-BR: Reservatório de expansão do radiador provisão para sensor de nível: Inclui sensor de nível de líquido de arrefecimento; Sem provisão para sensor; Pronto para sensor (apenas porta/provisão); Outros
it: Predisposizione per sensore di livello del serbatoio di troppo pieno del radiatore: Include sensore di livello del refrigerante; Nessuna predisposizione per sensore; Predisposizione per sensore (solo porta/predisposizione); Altro
pt-PT: Previsão para o sensor de nível do reservatório de compensação do radiador: Inclui sensor de nível de líquido de refrigeração; Sem provisão para sensor; Preparado para sensor (apenas porta/provisão); Outro
fi: Paisuntasäiliön nestetasoanturin valmius: Sisältää jäähdytysnesteen tasotunnistimen; Ei tunnistinvalmiutta; Tunnistinvalmius (vain portti/liitäntä); Muu
ru: Предусмотрен датчик уровня расширительного бачка радиатора: Включает датчик уровня охлаждающей жидкости; Не предусмотрена установка датчика; Подготовлен под датчик (только порт/место установки); Другое
en: Radiator overflow tank level sensor provision: Includes coolant level sensor; No sensor provision; Sensor-ready (port/provision only); Other
nb: Nivåsensor for overløpstank i radiator: Inkluderer nivåsensor for kjølevæske; Ingen sensortilrettelegging; Klar for sensor (kun port/tilrettelegging); Annet
ko: 라디에이터 오버플로우 탱크 수위 센서 장착 가능: 냉각수 수위 센서 포함; 센서 장착부 없음; 센서 지원(포트/장착부만 포함); 기타
el: Προεγκατάσταση αισθητήρα στάθμης στο δοχείο υπερχείλισης του ψυγείου: Περιλαμβάνει αισθητήρα στάθμης ψυκτικού υγρού; Δεν διαθέτει υποδοχή αισθητήρα; Έτοιμο για αισθητήρα (μόνο θύρα/υποδοχή); Άλλο
sk-SK: Vybavenie senzorom hladiny v prepadovej nádrži chladiča: Obsahuje snímač hladiny chladiacej kvapaliny; Bez prípravy na snímač; Pripravené na snímač (iba port/príprava); Iné
zh-CN: 散热器膨胀水箱液位传感器配置: 包含冷却液液位传感器; 无传感器接口; 预留传感器接口（仅端口/接口）; 其他
tr: Radyatör taşma tankı seviye sensörü tertibatı: Soğutma sıvısı seviye sensörü içerir; Sensör yuvası yok; Sensöre hazır (yalnızca bağlantı noktası/yuva); Diğer
ro-RO: Prevedere pentru senzorul de nivel al vasului de expansiune al radiatorului: Include senzor de nivel al lichidului de răcire; Fără orificiu pentru senzor; Pregătit pentru senzor (doar port/orificiu); Altele
hu: Hűtőfolyadék-tágulási tartály szintérzékelő-előkészítése: Hűtőfolyadékszint-érzékelőt tartalmaz; Nincs érzékelőkialakítás; Érzékelőre előkészített (csak port/kialakítás); Egyéb